Delaware, session 153, SB188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 1448A, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1448A. Background checks for sales of firearms [Effective until implementation of 84 Del. Laws, c. 259, Â§ 1, pursuant to Â§Â§ 5 and 6 of the act]. (e) This section does not apply to any of the following: (6) Transactions involving a âlaw-enforcement officerâ as defined by Â§ 222 of this title. title, which include transactions by a law-enforcement agency, as defined under Â§ 8584 of this title, for firearms to be used by law-enforcement officers employed by the law-enforcement agency in the performance of the law-enforcement officersâ official duties. Section 2. Amend Â§ 1448A, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1448A. Background checks and handgun qualified purchaser permit required for sales of firearms [Effective upon implementation of 84 Del. Laws, c. 259, Â§ 1, pursuant to Â§Â§ 5 and 6 of the act]. (e) This section does not apply to any of the following: (6) Transactions involving a âlaw-enforcement officerâ as defined by Â§ 222 of this title. title, which include transactions by a law-enforcement agency, as defined under Â§ 8584 of this title, for firearms to be used by law-enforcement officers employed by the law-enforcement agency in the performance of the law-enforcement officersâ official duties. Section 3. Amend Â§ 1448B, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1448B. Background checks for sales of firearms â Unlicensed persons [Effective until implementation of 84 Del. Laws, c. 259, Â§ 1, pursuant to Â§Â§ 5 and 6 of the act]. (c) This section does not apply to any of the following: (10) Transactions in which the prospective buyer is a law-enforcement agency, as defined under Â§ 8584 of this title, and is obtaining firearms to be used by law-enforcement officers employed by the law-enforcement agency in the performance of the law-enforcement officersâ official duties. Section 4. Amend Â§ 1448B, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1448B. Background checks and handgun qualified purchaser permit required for sales of firearms â Unlicensed persons [Effective upon implementation of 84 Del. Laws, c. 259, Â§ 1, pursuant to Â§Â§ 5 and 6 of the act]. (c) This section does not apply to any of the following: (10) Transactions in which the prospective buyer is a law-enforcement agency, as defined under Â§ 8584 of this title, and is obtaining firearms to be used by law-enforcement officers employed by the law-enforcement agency in the performance of the law-enforcement officersâ official duties. Section 5. Amend Â§ 1448D, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1448D. Handgun qualified purchaser permit required to purchase handguns [For application of this section, see 84 Del. Laws, c. 259, Â§â5]. (c) (1) A person applying for a handgun qualified purchaser permit as a qualified law-enforcement officer , as a law-enforcement agency, as defined under Â§ 8584 of this title, for a handgun to be used by law-enforcement officers employed by the law-enforcement agency in the performance of the law-enforcement officersâ official duties, or a qualified retired law-enforcement officer is not subject to paragraphs (f)(1) or (f)(4) or subsection (h) of this section.